District of Columbia statutes.
23-114

Corroboration of a child witness’ testimony not required.

For purposes of prosecutions brought under Title 22 of the D.C. Official Code, independent corroboration of the testimony of a child victim is not required to warrant a conviction.

May 3, 1985, D.C. Law 5-196, § 2(b), 31 DCR 5977
Abducting or enticing children from home for purposes of prostitution and harboring such children, see § 22-2704.
Cruelty to children, definition and penalty, see § 22-1101.
Sexual abuse, see § 22-3001 et seq.
Sexual performances using minors, see § 22-3101 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 23-114.